Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-175
National Guard; members in uniform; failure to admit or serve; penalty.

An owner, manager or employee of a hotel, restaurant, place of amusement or other establishment or place of business open to the public shall not refuse to admit or serve in the same manner and to the same extent as members of the general public are admitted and served a member of the National Guard wearing the prescribed uniform.

A person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 73, p. 1605;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 53.